Utah statutes.
19-6-204.   Guidelines for facility siting -- Considerations in adopting.
(1)  The board shall adopt and publish guidelines for the location of
hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities.  The guidelines
shall ensure that facilities are sited so that the wastes located there will
not constitute an unacceptable health hazard or impact the environment in an
unacceptable manner.
(2)  Proposed guidelines for siting shall take into account the following
considerations:
(a)  the zoning classification of the site proposed and its proximity to
present or projected land use dedicated to industrial development;
(b)  the existing land uses and the density of population in areas neighboring
the proposed site;
(c)  the density of population in areas adjacent to probable hazardous waste
delivery routes;
(d)  the risk and impact of accidents which might occur during the
transportation of hazardous wastes to the site;
(e)  the determination of areas that are dedicated to an incompatible public
use or are unsuitable for other reasons for the location of hazardous wastes;
(f)  the geology of the proposed site with special attention to the presence
of fault zones and the risk of contamination to ground and surface waters
through leaching and runoff;
(g)  the risk to life and property from fires or explosions that might occur
if improper storage and disposal methods are used;
(h)  the economic and environmental impact of the proposed facility site
location upon local governmental units adjacent to, or within which, the
facility is proposed for location;
(i)  closure and postclosure monitoring and maintenance requirements; and
(j)  other criteria required for the siting of hazardous wastes under state or
federal law.
